Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 14 Closing Out Sales

6-14-1.
“Person” defined.

As used in this chapter, “person” includes individuals, partnerships, voluntary associations, and corporations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-1

.

6-14-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-2

; Repealed by P.L. 1966, ch. 137, § 2.

6-14-3.
License required for sale.

No person shall offer for sale a stock of goods, wares, and merchandise under the description of “closing-out sale”; “going-out-of-business sale”; “discontinuance-of-business sale”; “selling-out”; “liquidation”; “lost our lease”; “must vacate”; “forced out”; “removal”; or other designation of like meaning, or a sale of goods, wares, and merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, unless he or she shall have first obtained a license to conduct a sale from the clerk of the city or town in which he or she proposes to conduct a sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-3

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-4.
Application for license.

The applicant for a license shall make an application to the clerk, in writing and under oath, at least fourteen (14) days prior to the opening date of the sale, showing all the facts in regard to the “closing out sale”; “going-out-of-business sale”; “discontinuance-of-business sale”; “selling out”; “liquidation”; “lost our lease”; “must vacate”; “forced out”; “removal”; or other designation of like meaning, or in regard to the damage caused to the goods, wares, and merchandise by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, and showing all the facts in regard to the sale that the applicant proposes to conduct and the place and manner of conducting the sale including an inventory of the goods, wares, and merchandise to be sold at the sale, which inventory shall contain only goods, wares, and merchandise actually in the place of business in or at which the sale is to be conducted at the time of the application together with the established retail price of the goods, wares, and merchandise, and a statement, as far as possible, of the names of the persons from whom the goods, wares, and merchandise to be sold were obtained; the date of the delivery of the goods, wares and merchandise to the person applying for the license; and the place from which the goods, wares, and merchandise were last taken; and all details to fully identify the goods, wares, and merchandise to be sold. The application shall specify the proposed period of time over which the sale shall continue, which period shall not exceed sixty (60) days; provided, that if it shall be made to appear upon sworn application to the city or town clerk, at any time during the period of sixty (60) days, that all of the goods, wares, and merchandise described and inventoried in the original application have not been sold and if upon the application it is accompanied by a statement of inventory of what remains, a license supplemental to the one provided for in §

6-14-6

shall be issued by the clerk upon the same terms and conditions as the original license granting authority to continue the sale for a period of only thirty (30) days. The original application shall also specify whether the applicant proposes to advertise or conduct the sale as a “closing out sale”; “going-out-of-business sale”; “discontinuance-of-business sale”; “selling out”; “liquidation”; “lost our lease”; “must vacate”; “forced out”; “removal”; or other designation of like meaning, or a sale of goods, wares, and merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-4

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-5.
False statements as perjury.

Any person making a false statement in the application provided for in §

6-14-4

shall, upon conviction, be deemed guilty of perjury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-5

.

6-14-6.
Issuance of license — Bond — Change of ownership.

If the clerk shall be satisfied from the application that the proposed sale is of the character that the applicant desires to conduct and advertise, the clerk shall issue a license, upon the payment of the fee of one hundred dollars ($100), together with a good and sufficient bond payable to the city or town in the penal sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) with sureties approved by a justice of the district court whose judicial district is situated in the city or town in which the sale is to be conducted, conditioned upon compliance with §§

6-14-3

and

6-14-4

and other pertinent sections of this chapter, to the person applying for the license, authorizing him or her to advertise and conduct a sale of the particular kind mentioned in the application, according to the requirements of this chapter; provided, that, after a change in the ownership of the whole of the goods, wares, and merchandise, or of the entire balance in case a portion has already been sold, no person shall carry on the sale until the new owner of the goods, wares, and merchandise or balance of the goods, wares, and merchandise shall have obtained from the city or town clerk the license required by §

6-14-3

in the manner previously provided; provided further, however, that any merchant who shall have been conducting a business in the same location where the sale is to be held for a period of at least one full year, prior to the holding of the sale, shall be exempted from the payment of the fee and the filing of the bond provided for in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-6

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-7.
Record of license application.

Every city or town clerk to whom application is made as provided for in §

6-14-4

shall endorse upon the application the date of its filing; shall preserve the application as a record of this office; and shall make an abstract of the facts stated in the application in a book kept for that purpose, properly indexed, containing the name of the person asking for the license; the nature of the proposed sale; the place where the sale is to be conducted; its duration; the inventory value of the goods, wares, and merchandise to be sold; and a general statement as to where the goods, wares, and merchandise came from, and shall make in the book a notation as to the issuance or refusal of that license applied for together with the date of the issuance or refusal; and shall endorse on the application the date the license is granted or refused, and the application and abstract shall be prima facie evidence of all statements therein contained. A copy of the application shall be forwarded by the city or town clerk to the office of the department of the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-7

; P.L. 1977, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-8.
Acts authorized by license.

The license as provided for in §§

6-14-3

—

6-14-6

shall be valid only for a sale of the goods, wares, and merchandise inventoried and described in the application for the license, in the manner and at the time and place mentioned and presented in the application, and any advertising relating to the sale shall prominently state the designation of the sale as contained in the license granted; the final date of the sale; and the license number. No license shall thereafter issue for conducting a sale of any goods, wares, and merchandise that have been removed from the place of sale inventoried and described in the application for the license under the provisions of this chapter at any other place or places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-8

; P.L. 1977, ch. 143, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-9.
Additions to stock in contemplation of sale.

No person, in contemplation of conducting a “closing-out-sale”; “going-out-of-business sale”; “discontinuance-of-business sale”; “selling out”; “liquidation”; “lost our lease”; “must vacate”; “forced out”; “removal”; or a sale of other designation of like meaning; or a sale of goods, wares, and merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, under a license as provided for in §§

6-14-3

—

6-14-6

, shall order any goods, wares, or merchandise for the purpose of selling and disposing of the goods, wares, or merchandise at the sale, and any unusual purchase and additions to the stock of the goods, wares, and merchandise within thirty (30) days prior to the filing of the application for license to conduct the sale mentioned in §

6-14-3

shall be presumptive evidence that the purchases and additions to stock were made in contemplation of the sale and for the purpose of selling the purchases and additions to stock at the sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-9

; P.L. 1966, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-10.
Additions during sale.

No person carrying on or conducting a “closing-out sale”; “going-out-of-business sale”; “discontinuance-of-business sale”; “selling out”; “liquidation”; “lost our lease”; “must vacate”; “forced out”; “removal”; or a sale of other designation of like meaning; or a sale of goods, wares, and merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, under a license as provided for in §§

6-14-3

—

6-14-6

shall, during the continuance of the sale, for the purpose of selling and disposing of the goods, wares, and merchandise at the sale, add any goods, wares, and merchandise to the stock of goods, wares, or merchandise described and inventoried in the original application for the license, and no goods, wares, or merchandise described and inventoried in the original application, and each addition of goods, wares, or merchandise to the stock of goods, wares, or merchandise described and inventoried in the application, for the purpose of selling and disposing of the goods, wares, and merchandise at the sale, and each sale of the goods, wares, and merchandise at the sale, that were not inventoried and described in the application, shall constitute a separate offense under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-10

; P.L. 1966, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-11.
Continuance of business after expiration of license.

Any person who, under the provisions of this chapter, conducts a “closing-out sale”; “going-out-of-business sale”; “discontinuance-of-business sale”; “selling out”; “liquidation”; “lost our lease”; “must vacate”; “forced out”; “removal”; or a sale of other designation of like meaning; or a sale of goods, wares, and merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, beyond the date specified by the sale, or who upon conclusion of the sale: (1) Continues that business that had been represented as “closing out,” or “going out of business,” or by similar designation as described in this chapter; or (2) Having discontinued the business, resumes the business within one year from the expiration date of the license for the sale provided for in this chapter, under the same name, or under a different name, at the same location, or elsewhere in the same city or town where the inventory for the sale was filed, or who, upon conclusion of the sale, continues business contrary to the designation of the sale; shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be fined in a sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or shall be imprisoned for not less than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months, or both, within the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 1956, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-11

; P.L. 1966, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-11.1.
Purchase of stock or inventory following a sale.

It shall be unlawful for any person who purchases from another the remaining stock or inventory or a portion of the stock or inventory remaining from a “closing-out sale”; “going-out-of-business sale”; “discontinuance-of-business sale”; “selling out”; “liquidation”; “lost our lease”; “must vacate”; “forced out”; “removal”; or other designation of like meaning; or a sale of goods, wares, and merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise; or who purchases stock or inventory from a person who no longer sells similar merchandise at the same location; to engage in the following conduct:

To advertise that the stock previously belonging to the original person or business is being offered for sale unless it is clearly stated what portion of the total merchandise as a percentage of the total dollar value of the entire inventory being offered for sale is the goods that were purchased from the original person or business.

To offer for sale stock previously belonging to the original person or business along with additional merchandise unless items belonging to the original person or business are clearly labeled as such.

Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall, upon conviction, be fined in the sum of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or shall be imprisoned for not less than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months, or both, within the discretion of the court. In lieu of, or in addition to the penalty previously provided in this subsection, the court may order the defendant to pay to the court a sum not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for the purpose of paying for an advertisement, prepared by the department of the attorney general, for placement in Rhode Island newspapers, pointing out the violation(s) of this section as presented in the false advertising, provided that the advertisement shall not indicate the name or address of the person convicted under the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-12.
Unlicensed sales.

Any person who shall advertise, represent, or hold out for sale a stock of goods, wares, and merchandise under the description of “closing-out sale”; “going-out-of-business sale”; “discontinuance-of-business sale”; “selling out”; “liquidation”; “lost our lease”; “must vacate”; “forced out”; “removal”; or other designation of like meaning; or a sale of goods, wares, and merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, without first having complied with the provisions of this chapter, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be fined in a sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or shall be imprisoned for not less than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months, or both, within the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-12

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-13.
Penalty for violations generally.

Any person who shall hold, conduct, or carry on any sale of goods, wares, or merchandise under the description of “closing-out sale”; “going-out-of-business sale”; “discontinuance-of-business sale”; “selling out”; “liquidation”; “lost our lease”; “must vacate”; “forced out”; “removal”; or other designation of like meaning; or a sale of goods, wares, and merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise, contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or who shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be fined in the sum of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or shall be imprisoned for not less than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months, or both, within the discretion of the court. In lieu of, or in addition to, the penalty previously provided in this section, the court may order the defendant to pay to the court a sum not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for the purpose of paying for an advertisement, prepared by the department of the attorney general, for placement in Rhode Island newspapers, pointing out the violation(s) of this chapter as presented in the false advertising, provided that the advertisement shall not indicate the name or address of the person convicted under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-13

; P.L. 1977, ch. 143, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 13.

6-14-14.
Enforcement in equity.

Upon complaint of any person, the superior court shall have jurisdiction in equity to restrain and enjoin any act forbidden or declared illegal by any provisions of §§

6-14-3

—

6-14-13

. In addition the court may award the complainant reasonable attorneys’ fees and may impose a civil penalty of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-14

; P.L. 1994, ch. 206, § 1.

6-14-15.
Exemption of public officers and acts under judicial authority.

The provisions of this chapter with the exception of §§

6-14-9

and

6-14-10

shall not apply to sheriffs, constables, or other public or court officers, or to any other person or persons acting under the license, direction, or authority of any court, state or federal, selling goods, wares, or merchandise in the course of their official duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3762, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

6-14-15

; P.L. 1994, ch. 206, § 1.

6-14-16.
Failure to comply.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter shall constitute an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under chapter 13.1 of this title, entitled “Deceptive Trade Practices”, and the penalties and remedies provided in that chapter shall apply against any individual, corporation, or partnership violating any provision of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 143, § 4.